Washington statutes.
RCW 18.360.100

Career path plan—Report.

Within existing resources, the secretary shall develop recommendations regarding a career path plan for medical assistants. The secretary shall consult with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, health care practitioner professional organizations, organizations representing health care workers, community colleges, career colleges, and technical colleges. The recommendations must include methods for including credit for prior learning. The purpose of the plan is to evaluate and map career paths for medical assistants and entry-level health care workers to transition by means of a career ladder into medical assistants or other health care professions. The recommendations must identify barriers to career advancement and career ladder training initiatives. The department shall report its recommendations to the legislature no later than December 15, 2012.

[ 2012 c 153 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 153 ss 1-12, 14, 16, and 18: See note following RCW 18.360.005.

Rules—2012 c 153: See note following RCW 18.360.005.